Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1076.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3003.23(a)(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 3003.23. Collection of Assessed Taxes.--(a) The following shall apply:(1) For a tax administered by the Department of Revenue, except under Article XXI, the Department of Revenue may collect the tax owed if collection commences within [ten] seven years of the date the settlement, determination or assessment of the tax 12345678910111213141516171819202122 becomes final. For nonfiled returns, the Department of Revenue shall induce the filing of a return or settle, determine or assess the tax liability of a nonfiled tax period within [ten] seven years of the tax return due date. The filing of a tax lien shall not extend the [ten-year] seven-year period to collect a tax.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to:(1) Taxes for which settlement, determination or assessment becomes final after the effective date of this section.(2) For nonfiled returns, taxes that have a tax return due date after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1076PN1175 - 2 - 123456789101112131415